Maryland, session 2026, HB1484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–1104.
IN A PROSECUTION BROUGHT FOR AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
COMMITTED AGAINST A MINOR, A STATE’S ATTORNEY MAY NOT ENTER INTO A PLEA
AGREEMENT THAT WOULD RESULT IN THE DISMISSAL OR NOLLE PROSEQUI OF ANY
CHARGE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1484*

HOUSE BILL 1484
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–722.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “PLACE FOR CHILDREN” MEANS A LOCATION
SPECIFICALLY INTENDED TO BE USED OR VISITED BY MINORS.
(2) “PLACE FOR CHILDREN” INCLUDES:
(I) A PLAYGROUND;
(II) A THEME PARK; AND
(III) A CHILDREN’S MUSEUM.
(B) A PERSON WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF AN OFFENSE IN WHICH THE
VICTIM OF THE OFFENSE WAS A MINOR AND THE OFFENSE REQUIRED REGISTRATION
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OPERATE OR ENTER A PLACE FOR
CHILDREN.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.